North Dakota, session 69, SB2025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from federal funds, to the department of veterans'
affairs for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department of veterans' affairs, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Veterans' affairs $1,897,804 $832,713 $2,730,517
State approving agency 323,129 67,207 390,336
New and vacant FTE pool 0 202,907 202,907
Grants - transportation program 1,126,085 193,621 1,319,706
Transport vans 18,800 4,200 23,000
Service dogs 0 50,000 50,000
Veterans' home cemetery 0 291,500 291,500
Total all funds $3,365,818 $1,642,148 $5,007,966
Less other funds 1,449,214 558,948 2,008,162
Total general fund $1,916,604 $1,083,200 $2,999,804
Full-time equivalent positions 9.00 1.00 10.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Homeless veterans' services $500,000 $0 $500,000
Veterans' home cemetery 0 291,500 291,500
Total $500,000 $291,500 $791,500
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of veterans' affairs may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line
item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds
from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the veterans' affairs and state approving agency line
items in accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as
approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - TRANSPORTATION GRANT PROGRAM - FEDERAL FUNDS -
2023-25 BIENNIUM. There is appropriated from federal funds, the sum of $200,000, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, to the department of veterans' affairs for the highly rural transportation

S. B. NO. 2025 - PAGE 2
grants program, for the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending June 30,
2025.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - TRANSFER TO VETERANS' POSTWAR TRUST FUND -
ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $500,000, which the office of management and budget
shall transfer to the veterans' postwar trust fund, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 37-15-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-15-03. Government of veterans' home.
The general supervision and government of the veterans' home is vested in the administrative
committee on veterans' affairsgovernor.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 37-15-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-15-07. Administrator of veterans' home - Appointment - Qualifications.
The appointment, qualifications, term of office, and salary of the administrator of the veterans' home
must be as prescribed in section 37-18.1-03by the governor. The administrative committee on veterans'
affairsgovernor may designate the administrator as commandant of the veterans' home if the
administrator is an honorably discharged veteran.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 37-15-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-15-16. Administrator shall take charge of unclaimed estates of small value.
If a member of the veterans' home dies leaving property of the value of three thousand dollars or
less, the administrator immediately shall take charge of the property. If within forty-five days of the date
of death a valid claim of any heir or devisee is not made for the property and an application or petition
has not been filed for issuance of letters of administration, the administrator shall convert the property
into cash without probate or other proceedings and make payment first toward reasonable funeral
expenses and second toward reasonable and necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last
illness of the decedent. If any cash remains, the administrator shall deposit the cash with the state
treasurer who shall credit it to the veterans' home operating fund. The administrator shall make a report
of the administrator's action to the administrative committee on veterans' affairs and the governor. The
report must be audited by, and included in the records of, the committee.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 37-18-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-18-01. Department established - Commissioner.
There is hereby established a department of veterans' affairs under the supervision and control of a
commissioner known as commissioner of veterans' affairs, hereinafter referred to as the commissioner.
The commissioner must be a bona fide resident of the state, and must qualify as a veteran as defined in
section 37 - 01 - 40. The commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the governor .
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 37-18-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2025 - PAGE 3
37-18-07. Commissioner - Appointment - Qualifications - Term - Salary.
The appointment, qualifications, term of office, and salary of the commissioner must be as
prescribed in section 37-18.1-03by the governor. The commissioner must be allowed such amounts for
travel, clerkhire, and expenses as may be prescribed from time to time by legislative appropriations.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 37-18-12 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 2, the department of veterans' affairs may accept
and expend funds from any source, including federal or private sources, to be used to assist
veterans or qualified veterans' spouses in obtaining assistance and to pay other expenses
authorized by law incurred in carrying out programs of benefit and service for resident North
Dakota veterans as authorized by the administrative committee on veterans' affairsgovernor
with the approval of the emergency commission.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 37-18.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
37-18.1-03. Powers and duties of committee - Creation of subcommittee and governing
board.
The committee is responsible for advising the governor on the organization, policy, and general
administration of all veterans' affairs in the state of North Dakota. It has the following powers and,
duties, and responsibilities:
1. The chairman and secretary of the committee, acting jointly, shall appoint a seven-member
governing board for advising the governor on administration of the veterans' home, from within
or outside the committee, subject to ratification of a majority vote of the committee, and shall
establish term lengths for service on the governing board. The governing board has all
ordinary powers required of a governing board, including the power to establish qualifications
for and selection of an administrator and to establish an appropriate salary structure, subject
to limitations of legislative appropriation. The administrator serves at the pleasure of the
governing board.
2. The chairman and secretary of the committee jointly shall appoint a subcommittee to be
responsible for advising the governor on the supervision and government of the department of
veterans' affairs. Once appointed, a subcommittee member may continue to serve as long as
the member remains a voting member of the committee, unless removed from the
subcommittee by joint action of the committee chairman and secretary. A member of the
subcommittee may not serve on the governing board of the veterans' home. Each nominating
organization listed in section 37-18.1-01 must have at least one voting member nominated by
the organization serving on the subcommittee. The subcommittee shall select by majority vote
of the members a chairman to preside for the term of one year.
3. The committee shall appoint the commissioner of the department of veterans' affairs. The
commissioner must be a bona fide resident of the state, and must qualify as a veteran as
defined in section 37-01-40. The commissioner serves at the pleasure of the committee. The
committee shall determine the salary paid to the commissioner of the department of veterans'
affairs within the limits of legislative appropriation. The commissioner of veterans' affairs shall
serve as the executive secretary for the subcommittee. The commissioner has no vote in the
affairs of the subcommittee.
4. The committee, under recommendation from the board or the subcommittee, shall present any
matters needing attention and action to the appropriate board, commission, agency, or
department of the state, and the North Dakota veterans' legislative councilgovernor.

S. B. NO. 2025 - PAGE 4
5. The committee shall assureadvise the governor regarding compliance with applicable federal
and state laws in the administration of both the department of veterans' affairs and the North
Dakota veterans' home and shall exercise its responsibilities in all things necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapteradvise the governor in regard to organization, policy, and
general administration of the agencies served and involved in the conduct of veterans' affairs.
The board governing the veterans' home and the subcommittee governing the department of
veterans' affairs shall conduct an annual performance evaluation of the administrator and
commissioner, respectively, with the evaluation presented to the committee. The board and
subcommittee shall create and implement a strategic plan for the veterans' home and the
department of veterans' affairs, respectively. The board and the subcommittee annually shall
report as to the status of the respective strategic plan to the committee. After receiving a
report, the committee shall submit the report to the governor.
SECTION 13. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and any unexpended funds may be continued into
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. The sum of $500,000 continued in section 5 of chapter 25 of the 2023 Session Laws
appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for a grant to assist in the construction
of the Fisher house at the Fargo veterans' affairs medical center in subsection 32 of section 1
of chapter 550 of the 2021 Session Laws;
2. The sum of $147,000 continued in section 5 of chapter 25 of the 2023 Session Laws
appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for improving and expanding veterans'
medical transportation in subsection 33 of section 1 of chapter 550 of the 2021 Session Laws;
3. The sum of $19,066 appropriated from the general fund for accrued leave of retiring staff in
section 1 of chapter 25 of the 2023 Session Laws;
4. The sum of $100,836 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for a document
scanning project in section 1 of chapter 25 of the 2023 Session Laws; and
5. The sum of $500,000 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for a grant to
assist in the construction of the Fisher house at the Fargo veterans' affairs medical center in
section 1 of chapter 26 of the 2023 Session Laws.
SECTION 14. EMERGENCY. Section 4 of this Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2025 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2025 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 69 Nays 22 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State